Maryland, session 2025, HB1109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
8–6A–01.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maryland Substance Abuse Fund.
(b) (3) The Fund consists of [the]:
(I) THE fee required under § 6–229 of the Criminal Procedure
Article[,money];
(II) CIVIL PENALTIES COLLECTED AND REMITTED TO THE
COMPTROLLER UNDER § 21–2F–02(E) OF THIS ARTICLE;
(III) MONEY appropriated in the State budget to the Fund[, all];
(IV) ALL earnings from investment of money in the Fund[,]; and
[other]
(V) ANY OTHER money accepted for the benefit of the Fund from a
governmental or private source.
SUBTITLE 2F. MEDETOMIDINE AND XYLAZINE CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT.
21–2F–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT CONTAINING ANY
AMOUNT OF MEDETOMIDINE.
(C) (1) “RETAILER” MEANS A PERSON THAT:
(I) SELLS, PREPARES, OR MAINTAINS MEDETOMIDINE
PRODUCTS OR XYLAZINE PRODUCTS; OR
(II) ADVERTISES, REPRESENTS, OR HOLDS ITSELF OUT AS
SELLING, PREPARING, OR MAINTAINING MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCTS AND XYLAZINE
PRODUCTS.

HOUSE BILL 1109 3
(2) “RETAILER” INCLUDES A MANUFACTURER, A WHOLESALER, A
CORPORATION, A PARTNERSHIP, A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, A FIRM, AN
ONLINE PLATFORM, OR ANY OTHER BUSINESS ENTITY DOING BUSINESS WITHIN THE
STATE.
(D) “XYLAZINE PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT CONTAINING ANY AMOUNT OF
XYLAZINE.
21–2F–02.
(A) A RETAILER MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE OR SELL A MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT
OR XYLAZINE PRODUCT UNLESS THE PURCHASER PROVIDES TO THE RETAILER
PROOF OF THE PURCHASER’S INTENT TO USE THE MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT OR
XYLAZINE PRODUCT FOR AN INSTITUTIONAL, VETERINARY, OR SCIENTIFIC
PURPOSE.
(B) A RETAILER MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE, SELL, OR EXPOSE FOR SALE A
MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT OR A XYLAZINE PRODUCT TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE
AGE OF 21 YEARS.
(C) A RETAILER THAT PREPARES, DISTRIBUTES, SELLS, OR EXPOSES FOR
SALE A MEDETOMIDINE PRODUCT OR A XYLAZINE PRODUCT SHALL MAINTAIN
RECORDS OF ALL SALES, INCLUDING A COPY OF:
(1) THE IDENTIFICATION USED AS PROOF OF THE PURCHASER’S AGE;
AND
(2) EACH DOCUMENT OR OTHER MATERIAL USED AS PROOF OF THE
PURCHASER’S INTENDED USE.
(D) A RETAILER THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING:
(1) $3,000 FOR A FIRST VIOLATION; OR
(2) $6,500 FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REMIT ALL CIVIL PENALTIES COLLECTED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO THE COMPTROLLER TO BE DEPOSITED
IN THE MARYLAND SUBSTANCE ABUSE FUND.
21–2F–03.

HOUSE BILL 1109
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.